Utah statutes.
32B-1-408.   Penalty.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided in this title, including Section 32B-4-411, a person who violates this part is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  A person is not subject to a penalty for a violation of this part if it is proved to the commission or the court hearing the matter that the person charged with the violation acted in good faith.

